Mississippi, session 2026, HB483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  For the purposes of this section, the term "water safety" means age-appropriate education intended to promote safety in, on, and around bodies of water and reduce the risk of injury or drowning. (2)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public school shall provide, to a parent who initially enrolls his or her child in the school, information on the important role water safety education courses and swimming lessons play in saving lives.  The information must be provided electronically or in hard copy and must include local options for age-appropriate water safety courses and swimming lessons that result in a certificate indicating successful completion, including courses and lessons offered for free or at a reduced price.  If the student is eighteen (18) years of age or older, or is under the age of twenty-one (21) and is enrolling in adult education classes, the information must be provided to the student. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.